incubator/apertium-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="क्/ओई__प्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसीने</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसीको</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसीसे</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसीमें</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इसीपर</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इन्हीं</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इन्होंने</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इन्हींको</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इन्हींसे</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इन्हींमें</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इन्हींपर</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओई</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="tam:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओई</l>
          <r>ओई<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="tam:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="कोई"><i>क्</i><par n="क्/ओई__प्"/></e>
